Illinois, session 104th, HB5049.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Residential Storage Act. 6    Section 2. Legislative intent. The purpose of this Act is 7to provide reliable energy at low cost to the People of 8Illinois, strengthen the electric grid, and promote the use of 9renewable energy resources by facilitating the deployment of 10residential energy storage systems. 11    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 12Sections 5-46005 and 5-46025 and by adding Section 5-46030 as 13follows: 14    (55 ILCS 5/5-46005)15    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 16delayed effective date)17    Sec. 5-46005. Definitions. As used in this Division:18    "Low-voltage solar-powered device" means a piece of 19equipment designed for a particular purpose, including, but 20not limited to, doorbells, security systems, and illumination 21equipment, powered by a solar collector operating at less than   HB5049- 2 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b150 volts, and located:2        (1) entirely within the lot or parcel owned by the 3    property owner; or4        (2) within a common area without being permanently 5    attached to common property.6    "Residential energy backup system" means a backup energy 7system installed at a residential property that is capable of 8providing no more than 50 kilowatts of electricity to the 9residence or has a storage capacity of no more than 200 10kilowatt hours. "Residential energy backup system" includes 11all associated infrastructure, equipment, and components of 12the system, up to and including any hardware that interfaces 13with the point of interconnection to the broader electric 14utility system. 15    "Solar collector" means:16        (1) an assembly, structure, or design, including 17    passive elements, used for gathering, concentrating, or 18    absorbing direct and indirect solar energy and specially 19    designed for holding a substantial amount of useful 20    thermal energy and to transfer that energy to a gas, 21    solid, or liquid or to use that energy directly;22        (2) a mechanism that absorbs solar energy and converts 23    it into electricity;24        (3) a mechanism or process used for gathering solar 25    energy through wind or thermal gradients; or26        (4) a component used to transfer thermal energy to a   HB5049- 3 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1    gas, solid, or liquid, or to convert it into electricity.2    "Solar energy" means radiant energy received from the sun 3at wavelengths suitable for heat transfer, photosynthetic use, 4or photovoltaic use.5    "Solar energy system" means:6        (1) a complete assembly, structure, or design of a 7    solar collector or a solar storage mechanism that uses 8    solar energy for generating electricity or for heating or 9    cooling gases, solids, liquids, or other materials; and10        (2) the design, materials, or elements of a system and 11    its maintenance, operation, and labor components, and the 12    necessary components, if any, of supplemental conventional 13    energy systems designed or constructed to interface with a 14    solar energy system.15    "Solar storage mechanism" means equipment or elements, 16such as piping and transfer mechanisms, containers, heat 17exchangers, batteries, or controls thereof and gases, solids, 18liquids, or combinations thereof, that are utilized for 19storing solar energy, gathered by a solar collector, for 20subsequent use.21(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-46025)23    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 24delayed effective date)25    Sec. 5-46025. Applicability.  HB5049- 4 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1    (a) As used in this Section, "shared roof" means any roof 2that (i) serves more than one unit, including, but not limited 3to, a contiguous roof serving adjacent units, or (ii) is part 4of the common elements or common area of a unit.5    (b) Except as provided in subsection (d), this This 6Division shall not apply to any building that:7        (1) is greater than 60 feet in height; or8        (2) has a shared roof.9    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Section, this 10Division shall apply to any building with a shared roof:11        (1) where the solar energy system is located entirely 12    within that portion of the shared roof that is owned and 13    maintained by the property owner;14        (2) where all property owners sharing the shared roof 15    are in agreement to install a solar energy system; or16        (3) to the extent this Division applies to low-voltage 17    solar-powered devices. 18    (d) The provisions of Section 5-46030 shall apply to any 19building with a dedicated electrical connection to a utility 20or a dedicated electrical meter, including a building with a 21shared roof. 22(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 23    (55 ILCS 5/5-46030 new)24    Sec. 5-46030. Residential energy backup systems. 25Notwithstanding any other law, a county may not adopt or   HB5049- 5 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1enforce an ordinance, rule, or other measure that would 2regulate the installation or inspection of a residential 3energy backup system. 4    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5changing Sections 11-15.5-5 and 11-15.5-25 and by adding 6Section 11-15.5-30 as follows: 7    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-5)8    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 9delayed effective date)10    Sec. 11-15.5-5. Definitions. As used in this Division:11    "Low-voltage solar-powered device" means a piece of 12equipment designed for a particular purpose, including, but 13not limited to, doorbells, security systems, and illumination 14equipment, powered by a solar collector operating at less than 1550 volts, and located:16        (1) entirely within the lot or parcel owned by the 17    property owner; or18        (2) within a common area without being permanently 19    attached to common property.20    "Residential energy backup system" means a backup energy 21system installed at a residential property that is capable of 22providing no more than 50 kilowatts of electricity to the 23residence or has a storage capacity of no more than 200 24kilowatt hours. "Residential energy backup system" includes   HB5049- 6 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1all associated infrastructure, equipment, and components of 2the system, up to and including any hardware that interfaces 3with the point of interconnection to the broader electric 4utility system. 5    "Solar collector" means:6        (1) an assembly, structure, or design, including 7    passive elements, used for gathering, concentrating, or 8    absorbing direct and indirect solar energy and specially 9    designed for holding a substantial amount of useful 10    thermal energy and to transfer that energy to a gas, 11    solid, or liquid or to use that energy directly;12        (2) a mechanism that absorbs solar energy and converts 13    it into electricity;14        (3) a mechanism or process used for gathering solar 15    energy through wind or thermal gradients; or16        (4) a component used to transfer thermal energy to a 17    gas, solid, or liquid, or to convert it into electricity.18    "Solar energy" means radiant energy received from the sun 19at wavelengths suitable for heat transfer, photosynthetic use, 20or photovoltaic use.21    "Solar energy system" means:22        (1) a complete assembly, structure, or design of a 23    solar collector or a solar storage mechanism that uses 24    solar energy for generating electricity or for heating or 25    cooling gases, solids, liquids, or other materials; and26        (2) the design, materials, or elements of a system and   HB5049- 7 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1    its maintenance, operation, and labor components, and the 2    necessary components, if any, of supplemental conventional 3    energy systems designed or constructed to interface with a 4    solar energy system.5    "Solar storage mechanism" means equipment or elements, 6such as piping and transfer mechanisms, containers, heat 7exchangers, batteries, or controls thereof and gases, solids, 8liquids, or combinations thereof, that are utilized for 9storing solar energy, gathered by a solar collector, for 10subsequent use.11(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 12    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-25)13    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 14delayed effective date)15    Sec. 11-15.5-25. Applicability.16    (a) As used in this Section, "shared roof" means any roof 17that (i) serves more than one unit, including, but not limited 18to, a contiguous roof serving adjacent units, or (ii) is part 19of the common elements or common area of a unit.20    (b) Except as provided in subsection (d), this This 21Division shall not apply to any building that:22        (1) is greater than 60 feet in height; or23        (2) has a shared roof.24    (c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this Section, this 25Division shall apply to any building with a shared roof:  HB5049- 8 -LRB104 19679 RTM 33128 b1        (1) where the solar energy system is located entirely 2    within that portion of the shared roof owned and 3    maintained by the property owner;4        (2) where all property owners sharing the shared roof 5    are in agreement to install a solar energy system; or6        (3) to the extent this Division applies to low-voltage 7    solar-powered devices.8    (d) The provisions of Section 11-15.5-30 shall apply to 9any building with a dedicated electrical connection to a 10utility or a dedicated electrical meter, including a building 11with a shared roof. 12(Source: P.A. 104-458, eff. 6-1-26.) 13    (65 ILCS 5/11-15.5-30 new)14    Sec. 11-15.5-30. Residential energy backup systems. 15Notwithstanding any other law, a municipality may not adopt or 16enforce an ordinance, rule, or other measure that would 17regulate the installation or inspection of a residential 18energy backup system. 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on the 20effective on June 1, 2026.